Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1084.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "tax credit" in section 1701-A.1 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended to read:Section 1701-A.1. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Tax credit." A tax credit authorized under any of the 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 following:(1) Article XVII-B.(2) Article XVII-D.(3) Article XVII-E.(4) Article XVII-G.(5) Article XVII-H.(6) Article XVII-I.(7) Article XVII-J.(8) Article XVII-K.(8.1) Article XVII-L.(9) Article XVIII.(10) Article XVIII-B.(11) Article XVIII-D.(12) Article XVIII-E.(13) Article XVIII-F.(14) Article XVIII-G.(14.1) Article XVIII-H.(15) Article XIX-A.(15.1) Article XIX-C.(16) Article XIX-E.(16.1) Article XIX-F.(16.2) Article XIX-L.(17) Section 2010.(19) Article XX-B of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949.(20) The act of December 1, 2004 (P.L.1750, No.226), known as the First Class Cities Economic Development District Act.(21) 12 Pa.C.S. Ch. 34 (relating to Infrastructure and Facilities Improvement Program).20250SB1084PN1294 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (22) Any other program established by a law of this Commonwealth in which a person applies for and receives a credit against a tax. This paragraph shall not apply to a credit against a tax liability as a result of an overpayment.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XIX-LCHILD ADOPTION TAX CREDITSection 1901-L. Definitions. The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:" Adopted child." A child who: (1) is adopted by a taxpayer;(2) at the time of adoption is under 18 years of age; and(3) is not the child of the taxpayer's spouse."Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth. "Resident individual." As defined in section 301(p)."Tax credit." The child adoption tax credit authorized by this article."Taxable year." As defined in section 301(v)."Taxpayer." A resident individual subject to tax under Article III.Section 1902-L. Child adoption tax credit. (a) Tax credit available.--A taxpayer is eligible for a tax credit as provided in subsection (b) against the tax imposed under Article III if:(1) The taxpayer adopts a child who at the time of adoption is under 18 years of age in the taxable year the 20250SB1084PN1294 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 adoption was finalized.(2) The tax credit is only claimed once per adopted child by the taxpayer or the taxpayer's spouse in the year the adoption was finalized. The tax credit may be claimed by individuals filing jointly.(b) Maximum tax credit.--A taxpayer may claim a tax credit in the amount of $1,000 for each adopted child.(c) Claim of tax credit.--A taxpayer must claim a tax credit under this article on a return filed under section 330.Section 1903-L. Forms and regulations. The department shall establish any form necessary to claim a tax credit, may require proof of the claim for the tax credit and may adopt rules and promulgate regulations to administer the tax credit.Section 1904-L. Report to General Assembly.(a) Annual report.--No later than October 15, 2027, and each October 15 thereafter, the department shall submit a report to the General Assembly indicating the effectiveness of the tax credit.(b) Information required.--The report required under subsection (a) shall include, but not be limited to, the following information:(1) The number of tax credits approved.(2) The amount of tax credits approved.(3) The amount of tax credits claimed.Section 3. This act shall apply to tax years beginning after December 31, 2025.Section 4. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB1084PN1294 - 4 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728